Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.020

Construction.

This chapter must be construed and applied to:

(1) Facilitate electronic estate planning-related documents and signatures consistent with other law; and

(2) Be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic documents and signatures and continued expansion of those practices.

[ 2024 c 188 s 3.]